src/fst/orthography/spellrelax-weighted.xfscript
# Ojibwe

regex [
a (->) {aa}::1.0,
{aa} (->) a::0.5,
o (->) {oo}::1.0,
{oo} (->) o::0.5,
i (->) {ii}::1.0,
{ii} (->) i::0.5,
e (->) {ee}::1.0,
d (->) t::1.0,
t (->) d::1.0,
g (->) k::1.0,
k (->) g::1.0,
b (->) p::1.0,
p (->) b::1.0,
{ch} (->) {tch}::0.5,

# Dealing with spaces instead of hyphens as separators in multipart words

[ %- ] (->) [ %- | " " ]+, # Multiple hyphens into a single hyphen
[ %- ] (->) 0::2.0         # Missing hyphens between prefixes/preverbs

];

# Explanation:
# lexical side (->) input 
